Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 15 Interstate Detainers

§ 7-15-101.
Contents and form of agreement on detainers.

The agreement on detainers is hereby enacted into law and entered into by the state of Wyoming with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows: the contracting states solemnly agree that:

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.9; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Article I

The party states find that charges outstanding against a prisoner, detainers based on untried indictments, informations or complaints, and difficulties in securing speedy trials of persons already incarcerated in other jurisdictions, produce uncertainties which obstruct programs of prisoner treatment and rehabilitation. Accordingly, it is the policy of the party states and the purpose of this agreement to encourage the expeditious and orderly disposition of such charges and determination of the proper status of any and all detainers based on untried indictments, informations or complaints. The party states also find that proceedings with reference to such charges and detainers, when emanating from another jurisdiction, cannot properly be had in the absence of cooperative procedures. It is the further purpose of this agreement to provide such cooperative procedures.

Article II

As used in this agreement:

“State” shall mean a state of the United States; the United States of America; a territory or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the commonwealth of Puerto Rico;

“Sending state” shall mean a state in which a prisoner is incarcerated at the time that he initiates a request for final disposition pursuant to Article III hereof or at the time that a request for custody or availability is initiated pursuant to Article IV hereof;

“Receiving state” shall mean the state in which trial is to be had on an indictment, information or complaint pursuant to Article III or Article IV hereof.

Article III

Whenever a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a penal or correctional institution of a party state, and whenever during the continuance of the term of imprisonment there is pending in any other party state any untried indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which a detainer has been lodged against the prisoner, he shall be brought to trial at the next term of court after he shall have caused to be delivered to the prosecuting officer and the appropriate court of the prosecuting officer's jurisdiction written notice of the place of his imprisonment and his request for a final disposition to be made of the indictment, information or complaint; provided that for good cause shown in open court, the prisoner or his counsel being present, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may grant any necessary or reasonable continuance. The request of the prisoner shall be accompanied by a certificate of the appropriate official having custody of the prisoner, stating the term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time already served, the time remaining to be served on the sentence, the amount of good time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions of the state parole agency relating to the prisoner.

The written notice and request for final disposition referred to in paragraph (a) hereof shall be given or sent by the prisoner to the warden, commissioner of corrections or other official having custody of him, who shall promptly forward it together with the certificate to the appropriate prosecuting official and court by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested.

The warden, commissioner of corrections or other official having custody of the prisoner shall promptly inform him of the source and contents of any detainer lodged against him and shall also inform him of his right to make a request for final disposition of the indictment, information or complaint on which the detainer is based.

Any request for final disposition made by a prisoner pursuant to paragraph (a) hereof shall operate as a request for final disposition of all untried indictments, informations or complaints on the basis of which detainers have been lodged against the prisoner from the state to whose prosecuting official the request for final disposition is specifically directed. The warden, commissioner of corrections or other official having custody of the prisoner shall forthwith notify all appropriate prosecuting officers and courts in the several jurisdictions within the state to which the prisoner's request for final disposition is being sent of the proceeding being initiated by the prisoner. Any notification sent pursuant to this paragraph shall be accompanied by copies of the prisoner's written notice, request, and the certificate. If trial is not had on any indictment, information or complaint contemplated hereby prior to the return of the prisoner to the original place of imprisonment, such indictment, information or complaint shall not be of any further force or effect, and the court shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice.

Any request for final disposition made by a prisoner pursuant to paragraph (a) hereof shall also be deemed to be a waiver of extradition with respect to any charge or proceeding contemplated thereby or included therein by reason of paragraph (d) hereof, and a waiver of extradition to the receiving state to serve any sentence there imposed upon him, after completion of his term of imprisonment in the sending state. The request for final disposition shall also constitute a consent by the prisoner to the production of his body in any court where his presence may be required in order to effectuate the purposes of this agreement and a further consent voluntarily to be returned to the original place of imprisonment in accordance with the provisions of this agreement. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the imposition of a concurrent sentence if otherwise permitted by law.

Escape from custody by the prisoner subsequent to his execution of the request for final disposition referred to in paragraph (a) hereof shall void the request.

Article IV

The appropriate officer of the jurisdiction in which an untried indictment, information or complaint is pending shall be entitled to have a prisoner against whom he has lodged a detainer and who is serving a term of imprisonment in any party state made available in accordance with Article V (a) hereof upon presentation of a written request for temporary custody or availability to the appropriate authorities of the state in which the prisoner is incarcerated; provided that the court having jurisdiction of such indictment, information or complaint shall have duly approved, recorded and transmitted the request; and provided further that there shall be a period of thirty (30) days after receipt by the appropriate authorities before the request be honored, within which period the governor of the sending state may disapprove the request for temporary custody or availability, either upon his own motion or upon motion of the prisoner.

Upon receipt of the officer's written request as provided in paragraph (a) hereof, the appropriate authorities having the prisoner in custody shall furnish the officer with a certificate stating the term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time already served, the time remaining to be served on the sentence, the amount of good time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions of the state parole agency relating to the prisoner. Said authorities simultaneously shall furnish all other officers and appropriate courts in the receiving state who have lodged detainers against the prisoner with similar certificates and with notices informing them of the request for custody or availability and of the reasons therefor.

In respect of any proceeding made possible by this article, trial shall be commenced within one hundred twenty (120) days of the arrival of the prisoner in the receiving state, but for good cause shown in open court, the prisoner or his counsel being present, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may grant any necessary or reasonable continuance.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to deprive any prisoner of any right which he may have to contest the legality of his delivery as provided in paragraph (a) hereof, but such delivery may not be opposed or denied on the ground that the executive authority of the sending state has not affirmatively consented to or ordered such delivery.

If trial is not had on any indictment, information or complaint contemplated hereby prior to the prisoner's being returned to the original place of imprisonment pursuant to Article V (e) hereof, such indictment, information or complaint shall not be of any further force or effect, and the court shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice.

Article V

In response to a request made under Article III or Article IV hereof, the appropriate authority in a sending state shall offer to deliver temporary custody of such prisoner to the appropriate authority in the state where such indictment, information or complaint is pending against such person in order that speedy and efficient prosecution may be had. If the request for final disposition is made by the prisoner, the offer of temporary custody shall accompany the written notice provided for in Article III of this agreement. In the case of a federal prisoner, the appropriate authority in the receiving state shall be entitled to temporary custody as provided by this agreement or to the prisoner's presence in federal custody at the place for trial, whichever custodial arrangement may be approved by the custodian.

The officer or other representative of a state accepting an offer of temporary custody shall present the following upon demand:

Proper identification and evidence of his authority to act for the state into whose temporary custody the prisoner is to be given;

A duly certified copy of the indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which the detainer has been lodged and on the basis of which the request for temporary custody of the prisoner has been made.

If the appropriate authority shall refuse or fail to accept temporary custody of said person, or in the event that an action on the indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which the detainer has been lodged is not brought to trial within the periods provided by this act, the appropriate court of the jurisdiction where the indictment, information or complaint has been pending shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice, and any detainer based thereon shall cease to be of any force or effect.

The temporary custody referred to in this agreement shall be only for the purpose of permitting prosecution on the charge or charges contained in one (1) or more untried indictments, informations or complaints which form the basis of the detainer or detainers or for prosecution on any other charge or charges arising out of the same transaction. Except for his attendance at court and while being transported to or from any place at which his presence may be required, the prisoner shall be held in a suitable jail or other facility regularly used for persons awaiting prosecution.

At the earliest practicable time consonant with the purpose of this agreement, the prisoner shall be returned to the sending state.

During the continuance of temporary custody or while the prisoner is otherwise being made available for trial as required by this agreement, time being served on the sentence shall continue to run but good time shall be earned by the prisoner only if, and to the extent that, the law and practice of the jurisdiction which imposed the sentence may allow.

For all purposes other than that for which temporary custody as provided in this agreement is exercised, the prisoner shall be deemed to remain in the custody of and subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and any escape from temporary custody may be dealt with in the same manner as an escape from the original place of imprisonment or in any other manner permitted by law.

From the time that a party state receives custody of a prisoner pursuant to this agreement until such prisoner is returned to the territory and custody of the sending state, the state in which the one (1) or more untried indictments, informations or complaints are pending or in which trial is being had, shall be responsible for the prisoner and shall also pay all costs of transporting, caring for, keeping and returning the prisoner. The provisions of this paragraph shall govern unless the states concerned shall have entered into a supplementary agreement providing for a different allocation of costs and responsibilities as between or among themselves. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to alter or affect any internal relationship among the departments, agencies and officers of and in the government of a party state, or between a party state and its subdivisions, as to the payment of costs, or responsibilities therefor.

Article VI

In determining the duration and expiration dates of the time periods provided in Articles III and IV of this agreement, the running of said time periods shall be tolled whenever and for as long as the prisoner is unable to stand trial, as determined by the court having jurisdiction of the matter.

No provision of this agreement, and no remedy made available by this agreement, shall apply to any person who is adjudged to be mentally ill.

Article VII

Each state party to this agreement shall designate an officer who, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this agreement, and who shall provide, within and without the state, information necessary to the effective operation of this agreement.

Article VIII

This agreement shall enter into full force and effect as to a party state when such state has enacted the same into law. A state party to this agreement may withdraw herefrom by enacting a statute repealing the same. However, the withdrawal of any state shall not affect the status of any proceedings already initiated by inmates or by state officers at the time such withdrawal takes effect nor shall it affect their rights in respect thereof.

Article IX

This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this agreement is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstances is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party hereto, the agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the states affected as to all severable matters.

Cross references. —

As to escapes by prisoners, see §§

6-5-206

and

6-5-207

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in article II in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1971, ch. 171, § 8, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 27, 1971.

Agreement on detainers. —

See § 7-15-102(a)(ii), (b) and notes thereto.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in article V(c), see § 7-15-102(a)(ii) and notes thereto.

Meaning of “this agreement.” —

For the definition of “this agreement,” referred to in articles I through III and V through IX, see § 7-15-102(a)(ii) and notes thereto.

Equal protection challenge. —

Inmate's equal protection rights under the Fourteenth Amendment and Wyo. Const. art. I, §§ 2, 34 were not violated when he was denied certain good time credit because the inmate was not similarly situated with other Wyoming prisoners where he had been transferred under the Interstate Agreement on Detainers, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-15-101

et seq., to face charges, and then transferred back to Colorado; the inmate was not processed in Wyoming after his conviction. Even if the inmate had been similarly situated, there was still no violation because there was a rational basis for the differing treatment since the credit was a behavioral incentive for Wyoming inmates.
Merchant v. State Dep't of Corr., 2007 WY 159, 168 P.3d 856,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2007).

Agreement provides statutory, not constitutional, rights. —

The Interstate Agreement on Detainers is merely a statutory set of procedural rules that do not rise to the level of constitutionally guaranteed rights. Green v. State, 784 P.2d 1360,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1989).

Statute subject to federal construction. —

Adopted as law by the state of Wyoming, the Interstate Agreement on Detainers is a congressionally sanctioned interstate compact within the compact clause, U.S. Const., art. I, § 10, cl. 3, and thus is a federal law subject to federal construction. Knox v. Wyoming Dep't of Corrections State Penitentiary, 34 F.3d 964, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 24093 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1994), cert. denied, 513 U.S. 1091, 115 S. Ct. 753, 130 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1995 U.S. LEXIS 295 (U.S. 1995).

Applicability. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-15-101(a) applies whenever a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment and during the continuance of the term of imprisonment there is pending in any other party state any untried indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which a detainer has been lodged against the prisoner. Odhinn v. State, 2003 WY 169, 82 P.3d 715,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 2003).

Because defendant's case in Wyoming was not resolved within 180 days of his request to have the charges against him in Wyoming resolved, his speedy trial rights were violated, and charges against him should have been dismissed as being in violation of the Interstate Agreement on Detainers. Odhinn v. State, 2003 WY 169, 82 P.3d 715,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 2003).

It is clear from the language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-15-101

that its speedy trial provisions apply exclusively to untried indictments, informations or complaints on the basis of which detainers have been lodged against the prisoner; by its terms, the 180-day time period, and thus the dismissal requirement, is limited to pending charges upon which the detainer is based; there is nothing in the language of §

7-15-101

which mandates dismissal of non-detainer charges after 180 days, including those charges arising out of the same criminal transaction as the charges forming the basis for the detainer. The Supreme Court of Wyoming's review of § 7-15-101, coupled with decisions from other courts interpreting similar Interstate Agreement on Detainers'
provisions, convinces the court that neither the 180-day time period in § 7-15-101, art. III(a) nor the dismissal provision in § 7-15-101, art. V(c) applies to non-detainer same transaction offenses.
Layton v. State, 2007 WY 1, 150 P.3d 173,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2007).

Applicability. —

District court
properly denied defendant's motion to dismiss based on the speedy
trial provisions of the Interstate Agreement on Detainers (IAD), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-15-101

(2013), where defendant produced no evidence that prosecutors
or law enforcement in Wyoming ever communicated with county jail
officials
or law enforcement in Texas or that the prosecutor did
any of the
things necessary to effect a transfer under Wyo. Stat. Ann.

7-15-101

, art. III or IV, and thus, no detainer was ever lodged
and the IAD did not apply. Turner v. State, 2015 WY 29, 343 P.3d 801,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2015).

Agreement on Detainers not violated. —

Allowing defendant's return to Weld County, Colorado before his trial in Wyoming facilitated an expeditious resolution of charges against him in Colorado, and purposes and policies behind Agreement on Detainers were thus supported and facilitated by defendant's temporary transfers; if anything, defendant was aided, not injured, and his request for dismissal of charges was therefore denied. Merchant v. State, 4 P.3d 184,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2000).

Three-month delay for new judge reasonable. —

Following the original trial judge recusing himself for cause, a delay of almost three months for the new judge to assume charge of a proceeding and to decide pretrial motions was neither unexpected nor unreasonably lengthy. The 120-day time limit of article IV(c) was tolled during this period. Jones v. State, 813 P.2d 629,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. July 11, 1991), cert. denied, 833 P.2d 540,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1992); Knox v. State, 848 P.2d 1354,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1993).

Dismissal for alleged violation of 180-day time period not warranted. —

Motion to dismiss a felony information was properly denied because the 180-day period under this section applied since defendant was the party who requested a disposition; moreover, he did not raise a timing issue until he filed an appellate brief. Defendant delayed Wyoming proceedings by 64 days by seeking a continuance of a preliminary hearing, and this delay was not unreasonable or not attributable to defendant; therefore, a jury trial was timely commenced in the 180-day period.
Short v. State, 2009 WY 52, 205 P.3d 195,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2009).

Processing of inmates. —

Under the Interstate Agreement on Detainers (IAD), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-15-101

et seq., the scope of the receiving state's custody is carefully limited and designed to be “temporary” in nature, and an inmate remains under the jurisdiction of the sending state. Therefore, Wyoming was not required to process an inmate after he had been tried, sentenced, and returned to Colorado.
Merch. v. State Dep't of Corr., 2007 WY 159, 168 P.3d 856,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Oct. 10, 2007).

Applied

in

Heffernan v. State, 824 P.2d 1271,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Duffy v. State, 730 P.2d 754,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 655

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Green v. State, 776 P.2d 754,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1989); Long v. Shillinger, 927 F.2d 525,

1991 U.S. App. LEXIS 3473

(10th Cir. 1991); Smith v. State, 871 P.2d 186,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of Interstate Agreement on Detainers, 98 ALR3d 160.

Availability of postconviction relief under 28 USC § 2255 based on alleged governmental violation of the Interstate Agreement on Detainers Act (18 USC Appx), 58 ALR Fed 443.

§ 7-15-102.
Additional definitions; short title.

As used in W.S.

7-15-101

through

7-15-105

:

“Appropriate court” means district court when the reference is to a court of this state;

“This act” or “this agreement” means W.S.

7-15-101

through

7-15-105

.

This act may be cited as the “Agreement on Detainers”.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 171, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.10; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to district courts, see chapter 3 of title 5.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “7-15-105” for “7-15-106.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 7-15-103.
Cooperation in enforcement of agreement.

All courts, departments, agencies, officers and employees of this state and its political subdivisions shall enforce the Agreement on Detainers and cooperate with one another and with other party states in enforcing the agreement and effectuating its purpose.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 171, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.11; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Agreement on detainers. —

See § 7-15-102(a)(ii), (b) and notes thereto.

§ 7-15-104.
Delivery of inmate to another state.

It shall be lawful and mandatory upon the warden or other official in charge of a penal or correctional institution in this state to deliver an inmate of the institution to the proper authority of another party state if required under the Agreement on Detainers.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 171, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.13; W.S. 1977, §

7-15-105

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to warden of Wyoming state penitentiary, see §

25-2-101

.

Agreement on detainers. —

See § 7-15-102(a)(ii), (b) and notes thereto.

§ 7-15-105.
Duties of attorney general.

The attorney general shall act as coordinator of this agreement and, acting jointly with like officers of party states, shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this act, and shall provide within and without the state, information necessary to the effective operation of this agreement.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 171, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.14; W.S. 1977, § 7-15-106; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to attorney general, see §

9-1-601

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-15-102(a)(ii) and notes thereto.

Meaning of “this agreement.” —

For the definition of “this agreement,” referred to twice in this section, see § 7-15-102(a)(ii) and notes thereto.